zh-CN: 网状网络技术: 802.11s; EasyMesh; 不支持; 专有网格; 其他
fr: Technologie de réseau maillé: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Non pris en charge; Maillage propriétaire; Autre
pl: Technologia sieci mesh: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Nieobsługiwane; Autorska sieć mesh; Inne
ru: Технология ячеистой сети: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Не поддерживается; Проприетарная mesh-сеть; Другой
vi: Công nghệ mạng lưới: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Không hỗ trợ; Mesh độc quyền; Khác
el: Τεχνολογία δικτύωσης mesh: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Δεν υποστηρίζεται; Ιδιόκτητο mesh; Άλλο
tr: Mesh ağ teknolojisi: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Desteklenmiyor; Özel mesh; Diğer
sv: Mesh-nätverksteknik: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Stöds inte; Proprietär mesh; Övrigt
nl: Mesh-netwerktechnologie: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Niet ondersteund; Eigen mesh; Andere
nb: Mesh-nettverksteknologi: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Ikke støttet; Proprietær mesh; Annet
it: Tecnologia di rete mesh: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Non supportata; Mesh proprietario; Altro
ro-RO: Tehnologia de rețea mesh: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Neacceptată; Mesh proprietar; Altele
th: เทคโนโลยีเครือข่ายแบบเมช: 802.11s; EasyMesh; ไม่รองรับ; เมชเฉพาะของผู้ผลิต; อื่นๆ
da: Mesh-netværksteknologi: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Ikke understøttet; Proprietært mesh; Andet
zh-TW: 網狀網絡技術: 802.11s; EasyMesh; 不支援; 專有網狀網路; 其他
es: Tecnología de red de malla: 802.11s; EasyMesh; No compatible; Malla propietaria; Otros
cs: Technologie mesh sítě: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Nepodporováno; Proprietární mesh; Jiné
ja: メッシュネットワーキング技術: 802.11s; EasyMesh; 非対応; 独自メッシュ; その他
de: Mesh-Netzwerktechnologie: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Nicht unterstützt; Proprietäres Mesh; Sonstiges
en: Mesh networking technology: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Not supported; Proprietary mesh; Other
pt-PT: Tecnologia de rede mesh: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Não suportado; Mesh proprietário; Outro
ko: 메시 네트워킹 기술: 802.11s; EasyMesh; 지원되지 않음; 독점 메시; 기타
sk-SK: Technológia zmiešanej topológie: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Nie je podporované; Proprietárna mesh sieť; Iné
bg-BG: Технология за многосвързана мрежа: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Не се поддържа; Собствена мрежа; Други
pt-BR: Tecnologia de rede mesh: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Não compatível; Mesh proprietário; Outro
fi: Mesh-verkkoteknologia: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Ei tuettu; Oma mesh-verkko; Muu
lt-LT: Tinklinė tinklų technologija: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Nepalaikoma; Patentuotas tinklelis; Kita
sl-SI: Tehnologija mrežnega omrežja: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Ni podprto; Lastniška mreža; Drugo
hr-HR: Tehnologija mesh umrežavanja: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Nije podržano; Vlasnička mesh mreža; Ostalo
hu: Mesh-hálózati technológia: 802.11s; EasyMesh; Nem támogatott; Szabadalmaztatott mesh; Egyéb